Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2648
Violations; civil fine; jurisdiction; Attorney General or county attorney; duties.

(1) Any person who violates any provision of the Pesticide Act, the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, or any final order of the department may be subject to a civil fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars for each offense, and in the case of a continuing violation, each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. The district court of the county where the violation has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which the violation of the act has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur, when notified by the director of such violation or threatened violation, to pursue appropriate proceedings without delay pursuant to this section.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 27.